Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-341
Decree of another jurisdiction; no force or effect; when.

A divorce from the bonds of matrimony obtained in another jurisdiction shall be of no force or effect in this state, if both parties to the marriage were domiciled in this state at the time the proceeding for the divorce was commenced except as provided in section 30-2353.

Laws 1949, c. 124, § 1, p. 331;

Laws 1975, LB 481, § 29.

Dominican Republic divorce decree involving Nebraska domiciliaries held of no effect and not entitled to comity. Weber v. Weber, 200 Neb. 659, 265 N.W.2d 436 (1978).

This section does not contravene full faith and credit clause of federal Constitution. Zenker v. Zenker, 161 Neb. 200, 72 N.W.2d 809 (1955).

Divorce obtained in foreign state is of no force and effect in this state if both parties were domiciled in this state at the time the proceeding was commenced. Yost v. Yost, 161 Neb. 164, 72 N.W.2d 689 (1955).